New York, session 2025-2026, S405.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph 5 of 2 subsection (pp) of section 606 of the tax law, as amended by section 3-a 3 of part U of chapter 59 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 (iv) (1) which is in whole or in part a targeted area residence within 6 the meaning of section 143(j) of the internal revenue code; or (2) is 7 located within a census tract which is identified as being at or below 8 one hundred percent of the state median family income in the most recent 9 federal census; or (3) which is located in a city with a population of 10 less than one million with a poverty rate greater than fifteen percent, 11 rounded to the nearest whole number, in the most recent five year esti- 12 mate from the American community survey published by the United States 13 census bureau; or (4) is located in a city with a population greater 14 than one million, in a qualifying census tract as of January first, two 15 thousand seventeen, and was owned by the applicant on January first, two 16 thousand ten. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable 18 years beginning on and after January 1, 2026. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01565-01-5